hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek > Táblagépalkatrészek > Táblagépképernyők és -képernyő-digitalizálók: Táblagép LCD és digitizáló szerelvények; Táblagép-csereképernyők; Táblagépképernyő-digitalizálók
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador > Peças para tablets > Telas e digitalizadores de telas para tablet: Conjuntos de LCD e digitalizador para tablet; Telas de reposição para tablet; Digitalizadores de tela para tablet
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare > Piese pentru tablete > Ecrane pentru tablete și digitizoare pentru ecrane: Ansambluri LCD și digitizer pentru tablete; Ecrane de înlocuire pentru tablete; Digitizere de ecran pentru tablete
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty > Díly pro tablety > Displeje a digitalizátory tabletů: LCD a digitizér sestavy pro tablety; Náhradní obrazovky pro tablety; Digitizéry obrazovek pro tablety
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras > Piezas de repuesto para tablets > Digitalizadores de pantalla y pantallas para tablets: Conjuntos de LCD y digitalizador de computadora tableta; Pantallas de reemplazo para computadora tableta; Digitalizadores de pantalla para computadora tableta
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur > Pièces pour tablettes PC > Écrans et numériseurs pour tablettes: Ensembles écran LCD et numériseur pour tablette; Écrans de remplacement pour tablette; Numériseurs d’écran pour tablette
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen > Onderdelen voor tablets > Schermen en schermdigitizers voor tabletcomputers: Tablet LCD en digitizer assemblages; Tablet vervangingsschermen; Tablet scherm digitizers
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai > Planšetinių kompiuterių dalys > Planšetinių kompiuterių ekranai ir ekranų skaitmeninimo įrenginiai: Planšetinių kompiuterių LCD ir skaitmeninių keitiklių moduliai; Planšetinių kompiuterių keičiamieji ekranai; Planšetinių kompiuterių ekrano skaitmeniniai keitikliai
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente > Deli za tablične računalnike > Zasloni in digitalizatorji zaslonov za tablične računalnike: LCD sklopi in digitalizatorji za tablične računalnike; Nadomestni zasloni za tablične računalnike; Zaslonski digitalizatorji za tablične računalnike
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit > Tablettitietokoneen osat > Tablettitietokoneen näytöt ja näyttösuojat: Tablet-tietokoneen LCD- ja digitizer-kokoonpano; Tablet-tietokoneen vaihtokuvaruutu; Tablet-tietokoneen näytön digitizer
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器 > タブレットPC用パーツ > タブレット PC 用スクリーン/スクリーン デジタイザー: タブレットコンピューターLCD・デジタイザーアセンブリ; タブレットコンピューター交換用スクリーン; タブレットコンピュータースクリーンデジタイザー
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件 > 平板電腦零件 > 平板電腦螢幕/數位繪圖板: 平板電腦液晶螢幕與數位板組件; 平板電腦替換螢幕; 平板電腦觸控數位板
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์ > ชิ้นส่วนคอมพิวเตอร์แท็บเล็ต > ตัวแปลงหน้าจอเป็นดิจิทัลและหน้าจอคอมพิวเตอร์แท็บเล็ต: ชุดประกอบจอ LCD และดิจิไทเซอร์แท็บเล็ต; หน้าจอแท็บเล็ทดแทน; ดิจิไทเซอร์หน้าจอแท็บเล็ต
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품 > 태블릿 컴퓨터 부품 > 태블릿 컴퓨터 액정/액정 디지타이저: 태블릿 컴퓨터 LCD 및 디지타이저 어셈블리; 태블릿 컴퓨터 교체용 스크린; 태블릿 컴퓨터 스크린 디지타이저
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera > Części do tabletów > Monitory i digitizery do tabletów: Zespoły LCD i digitizera do tabletów; Wymienne ekrany do tabletów; Digitizery ekranów do tabletów
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter > Deler til nettbrett > Skjermer og skjermdigitalisatorer for nettbrett: LCD- og digitaliseringsenheter til nettbrett; Reserveskjermer til nettbrett; Skjermdigitaliserere til nettbrett
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty > Diely tabletového počítača > Obrazovky a digitalizátory obrazoviek tabletových počítačov: LCD a digitizérové zostavy tabletov; Náhradné obrazovky tabletov; Digitizéry obrazoviek tabletov
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri > Tablet Bilgisayar Parçaları > Tablet Bilgisayar Ekranları ve Ekranı: Tablet Bilgisayar LCD ve Sayısallaştırıcı Montajları; Tablet Bilgisayar Yedek Ekranları; Tablet Bilgisayar Ekran Sayısallaştırıcıları
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components > Tablet Computer Parts > Tablet Computer Screens & Screen Digitizers: Tablet Computer LCD & Digitizer Assemblies; Tablet Computer Replacement Screens; Tablet Computer Screen Digitizers
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer > Ricambi per tablet > Schermi e digitalizzatori per tablet: Assiemi LCD e digitalizzatore del computer tablet; Schermi di ricambio del computer tablet; Digitalizzatori dello schermo del computer tablet
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти > Части за таблетен компютър > Екрани за таблетни компютри и дигитайзери на екрани: LCD и дигитайзер модули за таблет; Резервни екрани за таблет; Дигитайзери за екран на таблет
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件 > 平板电脑部件 > 平板电脑屏幕/触控感应层: 平板电脑 LCD 和数字化组件; 平板电脑替换屏幕; 平板电脑屏幕数位板
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή > Ανταλλακτικά tablet > Οθόνες & ψηφιοποιητές Tablet: Συναρμολογήσεις LCD και ψηφιοποιητή για tablet; Οθόνες αντικατάστασης για tablet; Ψηφιοποιητές οθονών για tablet
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos > Peças de tablet > Ecrãs de digitadores e ecrãs de tablet: Conjunto de lcd e digitalizador para tablet; Ecrãs de substituição para tablet; Digitalizadores de ecrã para tablet
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter > Reservdelar till surfplattor > Skärmar och digitizer för surfplattor: Surfplatte-LCD- och digitaliseringsenheter; Ersättningsskärmar för surfplattor; Skärmdigitaliserare för surfplattor
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente > Dijelovi tablet računala > Zasloni tablet računala i digitalizatori zaslona: LCD i sklopovi digitalizatora za tablet; Zamjenski zasloni za tablet; Digitalizator zaslona za tablet
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter > Reservedele til tablets > Skærme og digitizere til tablets: Tablet-computer – LCD og digitizer-samlinger; Tablet-computer – ekstra skærme; Tablet-computer – skærm-digitizere
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính > Linh kiện máy tính bảng > Màn hình máy tính bảng & Bộ số hóa màn hình: Bộ hợp LCD và bút cảm ứng máy tính bảng; Màn hình thay thế máy tính bảng; Bút cảm ứng màn hình máy tính bảng
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten > Tablet-PC-Ersatzteile > Tablet-Bildschirme und Bildschirm-Digitizer: Tablet-Computer-LCD- und Digitizer-Baugruppen; Tablet-Computer-Ersatzbildschirme; Tablet-Computer-Bildschirm-Digitizer
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты > Запчасти для планшетов > Экраны и дигитайзеры для планшетов: ЖК-дисплеи и дигитайзеры в сборе для планшетных компьютеров; Сменные экраны для планшетных компьютеров; Экранные дигитайзеры для планшетных компьютеров